District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.12

Borrower to receive memorandum of loan transaction.

Every pawnbroker shall, at the time of each loan, deliver to the person pawning or pledging any goods, article, or thing a memorandum or note, signed by him, containing the substance of the entry required to be made in his or her book by § 47-2884.11, excepting as to the description of the person and no charge shall be made or received by any pawnbroker for any such entry, memorandum, or note.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1042, ch. 970, § 12
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1912.
1973 Ed., § 2-2012.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.